Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB816.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. There is appropriated out of the general fund, transportation fund, restricted funds, and federal
funds in the State Treasury for the purpose of compensating persons and companies named below for claims which
have been duly audited and approved according to law, but have not been paid because of the lapsing or insufficiency
of former appropriations against which the claims were chargeable, or the lack of an appropriate procurement
document in place, the amounts listed below:
A. Joey Bastin Optical, LLC
3139 B Canton Street
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-1315 $99.00
Adecco USA, Inc.
Department CH14091
Palatine, IL 60555-4091 $946.11
Adecco USA, Inc.
Department CH14091
Palatine, IL 60555-4091 $1,240.80
Adecco USA, Inc.
Department CH14091
Palatine, IL 60555-4091 $7,729.31
ADI Radiology
PO Box 291625
Nashville, TN 37229-1625 $37.70
Advanced Diagnostic Imaging, PC
DBA Advanced Health
PO Box 507
Goodlettsville, TN 37070-0507 $118.19
AdvancedHealth, PC
DBA The Colorectal Center
PO Box 292367
Nashville, TN 37229-2367 $40.00
Ascension Saint Thomas Hospital Midtown
PO Box 749356
Atlanta, GA 30374-9356 $1,676.00
Ascension Saint Thomas Hospital West
PO Box 501052
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
St. Louis, MO 63150-1052 $1,600.00
AT&T TeleConference Services
PO Box 50024
Carol Stream, IL 60197-5002 $136.77
AT&T TeleConference Services
PO Box 50024
Carol Stream, IL 60197-5002 $211.51
AT&T TeleConference Services
PO Box 50024
Carol Stream, IL 60197-5002 $177.79
AT&T TeleConference Services
PO Box 50024
Carol Stream, IL 60197-5002 $1,278.48
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $219.98
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $158.98
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $540.96
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $475.81
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $665.99
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $520.99
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $396.34
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $832.35
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S

CHAPTER 119 3
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $477.99
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $419.97
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $28.09
AutoZone
1127 US Highway 127 S
Frankfort, KY 40601-4327 $366.09
Elizabeth Bailey
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $1,925.32
Baptist Health
PO Box 734839
Chicago, IL 60673-4839 $1,681.00
Baptist Health Deaconess Madisonville
PO Box 632123
Cincinnati, OH 45263-2123 $5,818.40
Bastin Optometric Clinic
220 West 18th Street
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-2010 $660.47
Bath County Child Support
PO Box 539
Owingsville, KY 40360-0539 $9,739.82
Callaway
PO Box 9002
Carlsbad, CA 92018-9002 $591.60
Cardiovascular Anesthesiologists PC
PO Box 277599
Atlanta, GA 30384-7599 $229.54
Carroll County Attorney
115 Fifth Street
Carrollton, KY 41008-1067 $36,743.74
Carroll County Attorney
115 Fifth Street
Carrollton, KY 41008-1067 $41,269.38
Cash and Richardson, PLLC
2520 Bardstown Road, Suite 7
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Louisville, KY 40205-2679 $500.00
Community Action of Kentucky
101 Burch Court
Frankfort, KY 40601-8353 $25,185.83
Robert Julius Craig
7125 New Campbellsville Road
Finley, KY 42718-6934 $250.00
Robert Julius Craig
7125 New Campbellsville Road
Finley, KY 42718-6934 $250.00
Danny Dittman
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $61.34
Eastern Kentucky University
Coates CPO 3-4
521 Lancaster Avenue
Richmond, KY 40475-3100 $187,798.28
EnSite, LLC
PO Box 1575
Paducah, KY 42002-1575 $30,217.51
FEP of Kentucky, LLC
PO Box 735839
Chicago, IL 60673-5839 $3,199.08
Julie Gaskill, DDS
Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery
1844 Lyda Avenue
Bowling Green, KY 42104-3361 $792.00
Genesight
Assurex Health - Patient - HC
PO Box 773273
Detroit, MI 48277-3273 $990.00
GRW Engineers, Inc.
Charles Baker, CFO
801 Corporate Drive
Lexington, KY 40503-5401 $39,038.12
Elana Hope Harper
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $416.24
Porsha Hodges
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $1,877.02
Hopkinsville Christian County Ambulance Service

CHAPTER 119 5
PO Box 117658
Atlanta, GA 30368-7658 $2,719.05
Insight Public Sector, Inc.
PO Box 731072
Dallas, TX 75373-1072 $72.90
Kentucky Skin Cancer Center
1818 Wallace Court, Suite 301
Bowling Green, KY 42103-2462 $389.14
R. Cole Lambert, DMD
320 Cool Water Court
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-8738 $101.00
Jennifer Lee
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $480.04
Lida Strategic Solutions, Inc.
PO Box 433
Oceanside, NY 11572-0433 $343.84
Lida Strategic Solutions, Inc.
PO Box 433
Oceanside, NY 11572-0433 $171.92
Maximus Human Services, Inc.
1600 Tysons Boulevard, Suite 1400
McLean, VA 22102-4893 $6,523.68
Tristen McGary
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $313.28
The Medical Center at Russellville
PO Box 783053
Philadelphia, PA 19178-3053 $209.03
Monroe County Board of Education
309 Emberton Street
Tompkinsville, KY 42167-1431 $2,709.88
Monroe County Sheriff
200 North Main Street, Suite E
Tompkinsville, KY 42167-1548 $175.00
Sara Morrison
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $65.20
Murtco, Inc.
PO Box 3460
Paducah, KY 42002-3460 $7,276.54
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Murtco, Inc.
PO Box 3460
Paducah, KY 42002-3460 $8,662.79
Nephrology Associates PC
201 Rosa Helm Way
Franklin, TN 37087-8408 $2,220.73
Northern Kentucky University
Office of Student Account Services
Nunn Drive AC 235
Highland Heights, KY 41099-8122 $11,928.76
Olds Law Office
DBA Kimberly J. Olds
134 North 2nd Street
Richmond, KY 40475-1406 $500.00
Julie Osterwisch
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $106.92
Owensboro Health Medical Group
PO Box 23229
Owensboro, KY 42304-3229 $2,412.38
Owensboro Health Medical Group
PO Box 23229
Owensboro, KY 42304-3229 $80.00
Pace Analytical Services, LLC
PO Box 907
Madisonville, KY 42431-0019 $508.73
Julie Parker Communications, LLC
760 Waterstone Drive
Wilmington, NC 28411-8045 $8,910.00
Dr. Harshul Patel
Trigg County Medical Clinic
250 Main Street
Cadiz, KY 42211-9153 $2,422.21
Pennyrile Family Dentistry
205 Burley Avenue
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-8725 $560.38
Pennyrile Physical Therapy
101 Forbes Drive
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-7200 $563.40
David Perkins

CHAPTER 119 7
DBA Perkins Law, PLLC
PO Box 236
Hodgenville, KY 42748-0236 $2,000.00
David Perkins
DBA Perkins Law, PLLC
PO Box 236
Hodgenville, KY 42748-0236 $500.00
Natalie L. Ralph, Attorney at Law
PO Box 22223
Owensboro, KY 42304-2223 $412.55
Natalie L. Ralph, Attorney at Law
PO Box 22223
Owensboro, KY 42304-2223 $411.85
Natalie L. Ralph, Attorney at Law
PO Box 22223
Owensboro, KY 42304-2223 $364.89
RiverValley Behavioral Health, Inc.
PO Box 1637
Owensboro, KY 42302-1637 $397,508.25
Destani Sears
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $632.97
Dr. Prakash Shah
1724 Kenton Street
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-1981 $1,000.19
Southeastern Emergency Physicians LLC
PO Box 740023
Cincinnati, OH 45274-0023 $1,391.00
Southeastern Emergency Physicians LLC
PO Box 740023
Cincinnati, OH 45274-0023 $19,921.27
Swartz Mowing Inc.
PO Box 124
Olympia, KY 40358-0124 $25,052.00
Tennessee Imaging Consultants
PO Box 305172, Dept. 98
Nashville, TN 37230-5172 $85.00
Taylor Law Office, PLLC
110 Knox Street, Suite A
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Barbourville, KY 40906-1426 $500.00
Taylor Law Office, PLLC
110 Knox Street, Suite A
Barbourville, KY 40906-1426 $1,500.00
Latonya Todd
Commonwealth of Kentucky Employee $598.95
Tryfacta, Inc.
4637 Chabot Drive, Suite 100
Pleasanton, CA 94588-2753 $2,850.00
UK HealthCare CE Central
138 Leader Avenue
Lexington, KY 40508-3215 $4,322.50
Western Kentucky Pulmonary Clinic
1724 Kenton Street, Suite 1B
Hopkinsville, KY 42240-1981 $1,446.50
Section 2. The claims listed below are for the payment of State Treasury checks payable to the persons or
their personal representatives, and the firms listed, but not presented for payment within a period of five (5) years
from the date of issuance of such checks as required by KRS 41.370 and 413.120.
Check #TA 16674571 dated April 13, 2015
Badgett Floyd T & T E
15015 Trace Road
Rush, KY 41168 $555.00
Check #T1 13265959 dated April 24, 2009
Bailen Ivan H
202 Walton Way, Ste 192-107
Cedar Park, TX 78613 $64.00
Check #EA 11947594 dated June 22, 2017
Brown Larry P & Linda G
5201 Telford Lane
Louisville, KY 40241 $153.00
Check #TA 18180820 dated May 18, 2018
Chilcote Michael A
7406 Windstream Circle Apt 202
Hanover, MD 21076 $2,688.00
Check #TA 19008032 dated May 28, 2020
Diaz Maria & R D
2313 Smith Street Apt 6
Ashland, KY 41101 $297.00
Check #EA 11978009 dated October 25, 2017
Fugate Joseph B & Mary J

CHAPTER 119 9
953 Holly Springs Drive
Lexington, KY 40504 $2,930.00
Check #EA 11885316 dated May 23, 2017
Grow Alexander J
3396 Hammersmith Lane
Cincinnati, OH 45248 $260.00
Check #TA 18715809 dated February 5, 2020
Hetfield James A & F T
PO Box 1760
Santa Monica, CA 90406 $1,907.00
Check #EA 11687191 dated May 21, 2014
Horne Forester & B V
457 Hidden Crest Drive
Somerset, KY 42503 $327.00
Check #GA 22873074 dated August 6, 2019
Indiana State Department of Health
PO Box 7125
Indianapolis, IN 46206-7125 $14.00
Check #GA 22873075 dated August 6, 2019
Indiana State Department of Health
PO Box 7125
Indianapolis, IN 46206-7125 $14.00
Check #GA 22873076 dated August 6, 2019
Indiana State Department of Health
PO Box 7125
Indianapolis, IN 46206-7125 $14.00
Check #GA 22933803 dated September 12, 2019
Indiana State Department of Health
PO Box 7125
Indianapolis, IN 46206-7125 $14.00
Check #GA 22933804 dated September 12, 2019
Indiana State Department of Health
PO Box 7125
Indianapolis, IN 46206-7125 $14.00
Check #BA 11184700 dated May 18, 2018
Iron Mountain
PO Box 1033
Northbrook, IL 60065 $8,029.71
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Check #BA 11216763 dated February 28, 2020
Ivantage Select Agency, Inc
Tax Dept
PO Box 3033
Northbrook, IL 60065 $702.00
Check #T1 4451674 dated May 4, 2006
Jefferis Christianna A
PO Box 24562
Lexington, KY 40524 $165.00
Check #GA 21611030 dated August 24, 2017
Lange Kenneth
449 Goebel Ct
Ft Wright, KY 41011 $302.39
Check #EA 12017005 dated September 25, 2018
McMenama John G & Gina C
4560 Larkhill Ln
Lexington, KY 40509 $82.05
Check #T1 2833004 dated May 26, 2004
Revenue Redeposit
501 High Street
Frankfort, KY 40602-3462 $74.00
Check #TA 16606026 dated March 26, 2015
Pate Robert S & Sara L
210 Bluegrass Drive
Lewisport, KY 42351 $277.00
Check #TA 16581154 dated March 19, 2015
Prabhakar Anusha
1206 Ironsides Lane
Harbor City, CA 90710 $250.00
Check #EA 11996622 dated May 1, 2018
Reed William S Mrs
3450 Stanley Road
Paducah, KY 42001 $2,292.25
Check #TA 17259570 dated May 4, 2016
Smith Derrald A & K J
75 Walters Lane
Grayson, KY 41143 $496.00
Check #TA 16304672 dated August 8, 2014
Szaks Ronald L & Anita C

CHAPTER 119 11
839 Concord Road
Richmond, KY 40475 $31.00
Check #TA 18715810 dated February 5, 2020
Ulrich Lars
PO Box 1760
Santa Monica CA 90406 $1,906.00
Check #GA 23299917 dated April 29, 2020
Utah Dept of Health
Bureau of Vital Records
PO Box 141012
Salt Lake City, UT 84114-1012 $14.00
Section 3. Whereas the persons and companies named above have furnished in good faith services,
supplies, and materials and the Commonwealth has received the same, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version